Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.292

Articulated pathway for teacher preparation and certification—Program approval.

The professional educator standards board and the state board for community and technical colleges may exercise their respective authorities regarding program approval to implement the articulated pathway for teacher preparation and certification recommended pursuant to section 2, chapter 136, Laws of 2014 in approved teacher certification programs and certificate and degree programs offered by community and technical colleges.

[ 2014 c 136 s 3.]